Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 8 Alert Systems for Unapprehended Suspects

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202 redesignated former Article 8 of Chapter 3 of Title 38 as Article 8 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

35-3-190.
State-wide alert system for unapprehended murder or rape suspects determined to be serious public threats.

There is established a state-wide alert system known as “Kimberly’s Call.”

As used in this article, the term “local law enforcement agency” means a local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the search for a suspect in a case of murder or rape.

The director shall develop and implement a state-wide alert system to be activated when a suspect for the crime of murder, felony murder, or murder in the second degree as defined in Code Section 16-5-1 or rape as defined in Code Section 16-6-1 has not been apprehended and law enforcement personnel have determined that the suspect may be a serious threat to the public.

The provisions of Code Sections 35-3-173, 35-3-175, and 35-3-178 shall also apply to “Kimberly’s Call” as set forth in this Code section.

On notification by a local law enforcement agency that a suspect in a case of murder or rape has not been apprehended and may be a serious threat to the public, the director shall activate the alert system and notify appropriate participants in the alert system, as established by rule, if:

A local law enforcement agency believes that a suspect has not been apprehended;

A local law enforcement agency believes that the suspect may be a serious threat to the public; and

Sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in locating the suspect.

The area of the alert may be less than state wide if the director determines that the nature of the event makes it probable that the suspect did not leave a certain geographic location.

Before requesting activation of the alert system, a local law enforcement agency must verify that the criteria described by subsection (e) of this Code section have been satisfied. The local law enforcement agency shall assess the appropriate boundaries of the alert based on the nature of the suspect and the circumstances surrounding the crime.

The director shall terminate any activation of the alert system with respect to a particular suspect if:

The suspect is located or the incident is otherwise resolved; or

The director determines that the alert system is no longer an effective tool for locating the suspect.

Any entity or individual participating in the “Kimberly’s Call” alert system pursuant to this Code section shall not be liable for any civil damages arising from the dissemination of any alert generated pursuant to the “Kimberly’s Call” alert system.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Code 1981, §

38-3-130

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38/SB 103; Code 1981, §

35-3-190

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 444, § 2-10/HB 271.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “of this Code section” was inserted in the first sentence of subsection (f) (now subsection (g)).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38(7)/SB 103, effective May 11, 2007, redesignated former Code Section 38-3-120 as present Code Section 38-3-130.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202, purported to amend and redesignate Code Section 38-3-120 as this Code section but actually amended and redesignated Code Section 38-3-130 as this Code section.

35-3-191.
State-wide alert system for suspects of crimes involving death or serious injury of peace officer; alert system for missing peace officer.

There is established a state-wide alert system known as “Blue Alert” which shall be developed and implemented by the director.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Law enforcement agency” means a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the search for a suspect in a case involving the death or serious injury of a peace officer or an agency employing a peace officer who is missing in the line of duty.

“Peace officer” means a person who is certified to exercise the powers of arrest.

The “Blue Alert” system may be activated when a suspect for a crime involving the death or serious injury of a peace officer has not been apprehended and law enforcement personnel have determined that the suspect may be a serious threat to the public and also when a peace officer becomes missing while in the line of duty under circumstances warranting concern for such peace officer’s safety.

The provisions of Code Sections 35-3-173, 35-3-175, and 35-3-178 shall also apply to “Blue Alert” as set forth in this Code section.

Upon notification by a law enforcement agency that a suspect in a case involving the death or serious injury of a peace officer has not been apprehended and may be a serious threat to the public, the director shall activate the “Blue Alert” system and notify appropriate participants in the “Blue Alert” system, as established by rule, if:

A law enforcement agency believes that a suspect has not been apprehended;

A law enforcement agency believes that the suspect may be a serious threat to the public; and

Sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in locating the suspect.

The area of the alert may be less than state wide if the director determines that the nature of the event makes it probable that the suspect did not leave a certain geographic location.

Upon notification by a law enforcement agency that a peace officer is missing while in the line of duty under circumstances warranting concern for such peace officer’s safety, the director shall activate the “Blue Alert” system and notify appropriate participants in the “Blue Alert” system if sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in locating the missing peace officer. The area of the alert may be less than state wide if the director determines that the nature of the event makes it probable that the officer is within a certain geographic location.

Before requesting activation of the “Blue Alert” system, a law enforcement agency shall verify that the criteria described by subsection (e) or (f) of this Code section have been satisfied. The law enforcement agency shall assess the appropriate boundaries of the alert based on the nature of the suspect and the circumstances surrounding the crime or the last known location of the missing peace officer.

The director shall terminate any activation of the “Blue Alert” system with respect to a particular incident if:

The suspect or peace officer is located or the incident is otherwise resolved; or

The director determines that the “Blue Alert” system is no longer an effective tool for locating the suspect or peace officer.

Law enforcement agencies shall notify the director immediately when the suspect is located and in custody or the peace officer is found.

Any entity or individual involved in the dissemination of a “Blue Alert” generated pursuant to this Code section shall not be liable for any civil damages arising from such dissemination.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-191

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 521, § 1/SB 397.

Cross references.

Obstructing or hindering law enforcement officers, §

16-10-24

.